Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. Wyoming Board of Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors

§ 33-29-301.
Creation of board.

The Wyoming board of professional engineers and professional land surveyors is created to regulate the practice of professional engineering and professional land surveying in order to safeguard life, health and property and to promote the public welfare. The board shall consist of eight (8) members appointed by the governor for a term of four (4) years and the state engineer who shall serve during his term in office. The board shall be composed of:

The state engineer;

Four (4) professional engineers. One (1) shall teach engineering at the university level. Two (2) shall be in private practice;

Three (3) professional land surveyors. Two (2) shall be in private practice; and

One (1) member who is neither a professional engineer nor a professional land surveyor.

The governor may remove any board member he appoints in accordance with W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 6, directs:
“Notwithstanding
W.S.

33-29-301

, the initial terms of the two (2) additional members of the Wyoming
board of professional engineers and professional land surveyors appointed
pursuant to this act, and the first terms of other board members appointed
after the effective date of this act, shall be for a number of years
which allows for staggered terms of all appointed board members, with
two (2) appointed members' terms expiring each year. Thereafter all
board members' terms shall be for four (4) years.”

§ 33-29-302.
Qualifications of board members.

Appointed members of the board shall have been residents of Wyoming for at least five (5) years immediately prior to appointment, shall be residents during their appointment and shall be citizens of the United States.

Professional engineer members shall have engaged in the practice of engineering as licensed professional engineers for at least twelve (12) years and shall have been in responsible charge for at least five (5) years.

Professional land surveyor members shall have been engaged in the practice of land surveying as licensed professional land surveyors for at least twelve (12) years and shall have been in responsible charge for at least five (5) years.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 33-29-303.
Compensation of board members.

Members of the board shall receive compensation for each day or part of a day in which they engage in the performance of their board duties at the same rate provided members of the state legislature under W.S.

28-5-101

and shall receive per diem and mileage, incurred in the performance of their board duties. Compensation and expenses incurred by the board or any member shall be approved by the board. Compensation and expenses shall be paid only from the fees collected by the board. This section shall not apply to the state engineer.

History.

2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “receive per diem and mileage” for “be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses.”

§ 33-29-304.
Organization of board.

The board shall meet as often as needed, but not less than four (4) times a year.

The board shall elect the following officers biennially to serve not more than two (2) consecutive terms: a chairperson, a vice chairperson and a secretary-treasurer.

Five (5) members of the board constitute a quorum.

The board is hereby transferred to the department of the state engineer under a Type 3 transfer as defined in W.S. 9-2-1707(b)(iii).

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
in (c), substituted “Five (5) members” for “Six (6) members.”

§ 33-29-305.
Powers of board.

The board shall have the powers necessary to enforce this act, including the power to:

Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to enforce this act;

Promulgate rules and regulations necessary to regulate the practice of professional engineering and professional land surveying, including qualifications for intern certificates and professional licenses, professional conduct, continuing education, discipline and license status categories;

Conduct hearings, take testimony, administer oaths, subpoena witnesses and issue subpoenas for the production of documents or data;

Use investigators, the office of the attorney general and consultants to investigate and evaluate possible violations of this act or the board’s rules;

Adopt an official seal for the board and adopt a professional seal for the use of licensees;

Employ a board administrator and such additional staff as necessary to administer and enforce this act and board rules;

Appoint advisory committees comprised of persons who may or may not be members of the board to undertake tasks assigned by the board. The board may reimburse committee members for reasonable incidental expenses incurred in the conduct of board business;

Establish and collect fees pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

. All fees collected by the board shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of the Wyoming board of professional engineers and professional land surveyors account;

Pay for membership to regional and national organizations and expenses incurred by board members to attend organization meetings;

Use electronic transmissions.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-306.
Professional engineers and professional land surveyors account.

All fees and other revenues received by the board shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the credit of the Wyoming board of professional engineers and professional land surveyors account. All monies in the account may be appropriated for the use of the board. The account shall be used by the board to defray costs incurred in the administration of this act. Disbursements from the account shall not exceed the monies credited to it.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-29-201(a)(xii)

§ 33-29-307.
Immunity from personal liability.

Any person reporting information to the board under oath and members, agents, investigators and employees of the board are immune from personal liability with respect to acts done and actions taken in good faith without fraud or malice.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

§ 33-29-308.
Confidentiality of records.

The following records and papers of the board are confidential and are not public records:

Letters of inquiry and reference concerning applicants;

Completed applications and verification and inquiry forms;

Transcripts of educational institutions;

Investigative and disciplinary matters dismissed without action; and

Files relating to complaints and investigations until a formal hearing is concluded or until final disciplinary action is taken if no hearing is commenced. This paragraph does not prevent use of the board files in a hearing.

History.

2013 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.